Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.100

Insurance coverage.

This chapter does not require or prohibit individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization to provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a person certified under this chapter.

[ 1988 c 277 s 9.]